Illinois, session 104th, HB5481.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 6.11 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/6.11)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-1)8    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 9Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 10provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 11covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 12Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 13health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 14Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 15356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 16356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 17356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 18356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 19356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 20356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 21356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, and 356z.77, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 22356z.82, 356z.83, 356z.84, and 356z.85 of the Illinois 23Insurance Code. The program of health benefits must comply   HB5481- 2 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 356z.19, 356z.88, 370c, 2and 370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code. 3The program of health benefits shall provide the coverage 4required under Section 356m of the Illinois Insurance Code 5and, for the employees of the State Employee Group Insurance 6Program only, the coverage as also provided in Section 6.11B 7of this Act. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 8requirements of this Section with respect to Sections 370c and 9370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code; all 10other requirements of this Section shall be enforced by the 11Department of Central Management Services.12    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 13any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 14with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 15Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 16Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 17whatever reason, is unauthorized. 18(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 19eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 20103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 217-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, 22eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 23103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-27, eff. 241-1-26, 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 251-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 26eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 11-19-25.)   HB5481- 3 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-1)2    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 3Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 4provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 5covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 6Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 7health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 8Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 9356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 10356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 11356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 12356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 13356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 14356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 15356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 16356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 356z.84, and 356z.85 of the 17Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health benefits must 18comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 356z.19, 356z.88, 19370c, and 370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance 20Code. The program of health benefits shall provide the 21coverage required under Section 356m of the Illinois Insurance 22Code and, for the employees of the State Employee Group 23Insurance Program only, the coverage as also provided in 24Section 6.11B of this Act. The Department of Insurance shall 25enforce the requirements of this Section with respect to   HB5481- 4 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1Sections 370c and 370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois 2Insurance Code; all other requirements of this Section shall 3be enforced by the Department of Central Management Services.4    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 5any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 6with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 7Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 8Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 9whatever reason, is unauthorized. 10(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 11eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 12103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 137-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, 14eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 15103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 167-1-27; 104-27, eff. 1-1-26, 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 171-1-26; 104-73, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, 18eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 19revised 11-19-25.) 20    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 21Section 5-1069.3 as follows: 22    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069.3)23    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-446)24    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county,   HB5481- 5 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 2of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 3coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 4benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 5health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 6under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 7356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 8356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 9356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 10356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 11356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 12356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.74, 13and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 14356z.84, and 356z.85 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 15coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, 16356z.88, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 17Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 18Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 19provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function of 20the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, 21Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 22rule county to which this Section applies must comply with 23every provision of this Section. 24    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 25any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 26with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure   HB5481- 6 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 2Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 3whatever reason, is unauthorized. 4(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 5103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 68-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 7eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 8103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 96-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 101-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 11eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 1-7-26.) 12    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-446)13    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county, 14including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 15of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 16coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 17benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 18health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 19under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 20356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 21356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 22356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 23356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 24356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 25356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.74,   HB5481- 7 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 2356z.84, and 356z.85 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 3coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, 4356z.88, 370c, and 370c.4 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 5Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 6Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 7provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function of 8the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, 9Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 10rule county to which this Section applies must comply with 11every provision of this Section. 12    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 13any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 14with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 15Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 16Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 17whatever reason, is unauthorized. 18(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 19103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 208-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 21eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 22103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 236-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 241-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 25eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-446, eff. 6-1-26; 26revised 1-7-26.)   HB5481- 8 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 2changing Section 10-4-2.3 as follows: 3    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.3)4    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-446)5    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a 6municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 7self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 8coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 9coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 10covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 11Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 12356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 13356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 14356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 15356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 16356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 17356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 18356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.74, and 356z.77, 19356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 356z.84, and 20356z.85 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 21comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, 356z.88, and 370c 22of the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance 23shall enforce the requirements of this Section. The 24requirement that health benefits be covered as provided in   HB5481- 9 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1this Section is an exclusive power and function of the State 2and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, Section 6, 3subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home rule 4municipality to which this Section applies must comply with 5every provision of this Section. 6    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 7any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 8with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 9Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 10Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 11whatever reason, is unauthorized. 12(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 13103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 148-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 15eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 16103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 176-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 181-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 19eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 1-8-26.) 20    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-446)21    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a 22municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 23self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 24coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 25coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be   HB5481- 10 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 2Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 3356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 4356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 5356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 6356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 7356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 8356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 9356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.74, and 356z.77, 10356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 356z.84, and 11356z.85 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 12comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, 356z.88, 370c, 13and 370c.4 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of 14Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section. The 15requirement that health benefits be covered as provided in 16this Section is an exclusive power and function of the State 17and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, Section 6, 18subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home rule 19municipality to which this Section applies must comply with 20every provision of this Section. 21    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 22any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 23with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 24Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 25Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 26whatever reason, is unauthorized.   HB5481- 11 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 2103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 38-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 4eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 5103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 66-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 71-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 8eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-446, eff. 6-1-26; 9revised 1-8-26.) 10    Section 20. The School Code is amended by changing Section 1110-22.3f as follows: 12    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3f)13    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-446)14    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 15protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 16post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 17policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 18the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 19356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 20356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 21356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 22356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 23356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 24356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71,   HB5481- 12 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1356z.74, and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 2356z.83, 356z.84, and 356z.85 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 3Insurance policies shall comply with Sections Section 356z.19 4and 356z.88 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 5comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, and 370c and Article 6XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of 7Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section. 8    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 9any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 10with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 11Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 12Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 13whatever reason, is unauthorized. 14(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 15103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 168-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 17eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 18103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 196-9-25; 104-27, eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 201-1-26; 104-73, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, 21eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 22revised 1-8-26.) 23    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-446)24    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 25protection and benefits for employees shall provide the   HB5481- 13 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 2policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 3the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 4356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 5356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 6356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 7356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 8356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 9356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 10356z.74, and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 11356z.83, 356z.84, and 356z.85 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 12Insurance policies shall comply with Sections Section 356z.19 13and 356z.88 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 14comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 370c, and 370c.4 and 15Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department 16of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section. 17    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 18any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 19with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 20Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 21Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 22whatever reason, is unauthorized. 23(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 24103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 258-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 26eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25;   HB5481- 14 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 26-9-25; 104-27, eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 31-1-26; 104-73, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, 4eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 5104-446, eff. 6-1-26; revised 1-8-26.) 6    Section 25. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 7adding Section 356z.88 as follows: 8    (215 ILCS 5/356z.88 new)9    Sec. 356z.88. Confidentiality on explanation of benefit 10forms.11    (a) Health insurance issuers shall not specify or describe 12personal sensitive health care information in any explanation 13of benefits, summary of payments, claims history, or any other 14communication or record relating to payment or coverage of 15services or procedures involving sensitive health care 16information for an insured member other than the insured 17subscriber, unless the insured member receiving the service or 18procedure clearly makes a request orally or in writing to not 19suppress information relating to sensitive health care.20    (b) The Department shall define sensitive health care 21services and information for the purposes of this Section. In 22determining that definition, the Department shall consider the 23recommendations of the National Committee on Vital and Health 24Statistics and similar regulations in other states and shall   HB5481- 15 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1consult with experts in fields, including, but not limited to, 2infectious disease, reproductive and sexual health, domestic 3violence and sexual assault, and mental health and substance 4use disorders.5    (c) The Department shall adopt rules necessary to 6implement and enforce this Section, which shall include 7requirements for reasonable reporting by health insurance 8issuers to the division regarding compliance and the number 9and type of complaints received regarding noncompliance with 10this Section.11    (d) The Department of Insurance, in collaboration with the 12Department of Public Health, shall develop and implement a 13plan to educate health care providers and consumers regarding 14the rights of insured members and the responsibilities of 15health insurance issuers to promote compliance with this 16Section. The plan shall include, but not be limited to, staff 17training and other education for hospitals, community health 18centers, school-based health centers, physicians, nurses, 19other licensed health care professionals, and administrative 20staff, including, but not limited to: (i) all staff involved 21in patient registration and confidentiality education and (ii) 22billing staff involved in processing insurance claims. The 23plan shall be developed in consultation with groups 24representing health care insurers, providers, and consumers, 25including consumer organizations concerned with the provision 26of sensitive health care services.  HB5481- 16 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1    (e) Nothing in this Section shall supersede any general or 2special law related to the informed consent of minors.  3    Section 30. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 4amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 5    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)6    Sec. 5-3. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. 7    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 8the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 9141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 10152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 11155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355.7, 355b, 355c, 356f, 12356g, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 13356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 14356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 15356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 16356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 17356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 18356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 19356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 20356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 21356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 22356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 23356z.76, 356z.77, 356z.78, 356z.79, 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 24356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2,   HB5481- 17 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 370a, 370c, 2370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, 3and 444.1, paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of Section 367, and 4Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, 5XXVI, and XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code.6    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 7for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 8Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 9are deemed to be "domestic companies":10        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 11    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;12        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 13    State; or14        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 15    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 16    of this State, except a corporation subject to 17    substantially the same requirements in its state of 18    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 19    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.20    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 21acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 22pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,23        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 24    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 25    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 26    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other   HB5481- 18 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1    acquisition of control takes effect;2        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 3    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 4    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 5    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 6    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 7    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 8    other acquisition of control;9        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 10    following information:11            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 12        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 13        Organization sought to be acquired;14            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 15        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 16        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 17        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 18        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 19        forma financial statements reflecting projected 20        combined operation for a period of 2 years;21            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 22        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 23        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 24        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and25            (D) such other information as the Director shall 26        require.  HB5481- 19 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 2Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 3any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 4enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 5maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 6to its health care certificates).7    (e) In considering any management contract or service 8agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 9Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 10specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 11take into account the effect of the management contract or 12service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 13and the financial condition of the health maintenance 14organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 15into account the effect of the management contract or service 16agreement on competition.17    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 18Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 19Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 20defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 21Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 22group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 23additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:24        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 25    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 26    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance   HB5481- 20 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 2    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 3    not be less than one year); and4        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 5    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 6    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 7    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 8    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 9    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 10    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 11    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 12    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 13    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 14    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 15    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 16    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 17    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 18    plan years.19    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 20statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 21describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 22and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 23the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 24to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 25profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 26unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit   HB5481- 21 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 2experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 3the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 4enrollment unit.5    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 6Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 7contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 8refund authorized under this Section.9    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 10if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 11accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 12Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 13Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 14adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 15(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 16103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-420, eff. 171-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, 18eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 19103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 201-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, 21eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 22103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 231-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 6-9-25; 104-28, 24eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, 25eff. 1-1-26; 104-98, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 26104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-334, eff. 8-15-25; 104-379, eff.   HB5481- 22 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b11-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 11-21-25.) 2    Section 35. The Limited Health Service Organization Act is 3amended by changing Section 4003 as follows: 4    (215 ILCS 130/4003)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3)5    Sec. 4003. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Limited 6health service organizations shall be subject to the 7provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 141.1, 8141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 152, 153, 9154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.37, 155.49, 352c, 10355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356m, 356q, 356v, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 11356z.10, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 12356z.33, 356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 13356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 14356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.79, 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.83, 15356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, 364.3, 368a, 370a, 401, 401.1, 402, 16403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1 and Articles 17IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and 18XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code. Nothing in this Section 19shall require a limited health care plan to cover any service 20that is not a limited health service. For purposes of the 21Illinois Insurance Code, except for Sections 444 and 444.1 and 22Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, limited health service 23organizations in the following categories are deemed to be 24domestic companies:  HB5481- 23 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1        (1) a corporation under the laws of this State; or2        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of another 3    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 4    of this State, except a corporation subject to 5    substantially the same requirements in its state of 6    organization as is a domestic company under Article VIII 7    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.8(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 9103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, eff. 101-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, 11eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 12103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 131-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 6-9-25; 104-42, 14eff. 8-1-25; 104-73, eff. 1-1-26; 104-98, eff. 1-1-26; 15104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-334, eff. 168-15-25; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 1711-21-25.) 18    Section 40. The Voluntary Health Services Plans Act is 19amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 20    (215 ILCS 165/10)  (from Ch. 32, par. 604)21    Sec. 10. Application of Illinois Insurance Code 22provisions. Health services plan corporations and all persons 23interested therein or dealing therewith shall be subject to 24the provisions of Articles IIA and XII 1/2 and Sections 3.1,   HB5481- 24 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1133, 136, 139, 140, 143, 143.31, 143c, 149, 155.22a, 155.37, 2354, 355.2, 355.3, 355.7, 355b, 355d, 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 3356m, 356q, 356r, 356t, 356u, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356y, 4356z.1, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 5356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 6356z.15, 356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 7356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.32a, 356z.33, 356z.40, 8356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 9356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 10356z.68, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 356z.79, 11356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, 364.01, 12364.3, 367.2, 368a, 370a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 13408.2, and 412, and paragraphs (7) and (15) of Section 367 of 14the Illinois Insurance Code.15    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 16any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 17with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 18Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 19Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 20whatever reason, is unauthorized. 21(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 22103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 238-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, 24eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 25103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 261-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1,   HB5481- 25 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1eff. 6-9-25; 104-28, eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-73, 2eff. 1-1-26; 104-98, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 3104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 48-15-25; revised 11-21-25.) 5    Section 45. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 6changing Section 5-16.8 as follows: 7    (305 ILCS 5/5-16.8)8    Sec. 5-16.8. Required health benefits. The medical 9assistance program shall (i) provide the post-mastectomy care 10benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 11health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 12under Sections 356g.5, 356q, 356u, 356w, 356x, 356z.6, 13356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.46, 14356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.64, 15356z.67, 356z.71, and 356z.75, and 356z.80, 356z.84, and 16356z.85 of the Illinois Insurance Code, (ii) be subject to the 17provisions of Sections 356z.19, 356z.44, 356z.49, 356z.88, 18364.01, 370c, and 370c.1 of the Illinois Insurance Code, and 19(iii) be subject to the provisions of subsection (d-5) of 20Section 10 of the Network Adequacy and Transparency Act.21    The Department, by rule, shall adopt a model similar to 22the requirements of Section 356z.39 of the Illinois Insurance 23Code. 24    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any   HB5481- 26 -LRB104 19193 BAB 32638 b1rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 2any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 3of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 4with Section 5-5e. 5    To ensure full access to the benefits set forth in this 6Section, on and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall 7ensure that provider and hospital reimbursement for 8post-mastectomy care benefits required under this Section are 9no lower than the Medicare reimbursement rate. 10(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 11103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-703, eff. 121-1-25; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-73, 13eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 14104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 11-21-25.) 15    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 16changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 17that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 18represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 19not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 20made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 21Public Act. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect one year 23after becoming law.